Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-111
Female prisoners; female correctional officer; appointment; oath; reports.

(1) This section applies to a county containing a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary class.

(2) In every county jail where there is a female prisoner, twenty-four-hour supervision shall be provided by a female correctional officer appointed by the county board, whose duty it shall be to have entire charge of the female prisoners. The board may also in its discretion appoint a female correctional officer when there is a sick prisoner or one that is a minor under the age of sixteen.

(3) Such female correctional officers shall:

(a) Be under the direction of the sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail;

(b) Take the necessary oath before entering upon the duties of the office;

(c) Be paid by the board from the county treasury only for the time actually engaged; and

(d) When required, report to the board or district judges.

Laws 1903, c. 55, § 1, p. 346;

R.S.1913, § 3538;

Laws 1919, c. 113, § 1, p. 277;

C.S.1922, § 3005;

C.S.1929, § 47-110;

R.S.1943, § 47-111;

Laws 1947, c. 62, § 15, p. 207;

Laws 1947, c. 76, § 3, p. 240;

Laws 1951, c. 53, § 4, p. 182;

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 36;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB1195, § 1.
July 18, 2026